West Virginia, session 2025, HB3021.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE. §5B-1-3a. Jurisdiction of the secretary of Department of Commerce to determine public interest in permitting retail access to competition plan by legislature. (a) The Department of Commerce is the appropriate agency to adopt a plan whereby users of electricity in the state would have open access across existing and new utility delivery systems to a competitive market for power supply. The Department of Commerce shall develop such a plan for submission to the Legislature for approval, hereafter designated in this section as a "competition plan."(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, any deregulation plan approved by the Legislature shall include: (1) Market-based competition between multiple, concurrent operators of electrical utilities within the same given geographical regions of West Virginia, with consumers receiving relevant information prior to choosing an electrical supplier, to include, but not be limited to, the following: (A) Means of electrical production, including source of energy, process used in generation process, and management process of waste products. (B) Disclosure of subsidies received from federal, state, local, or any combination of the three levels, that are received by the producer toward support of production.(C) Statement of environmental management.(D) Utility customer service rate options, billing schedule, terms, and conditions.(c) They will also ensure that qualifications for prospective electrical utility operators include provisions for at least 75% average daily utilization rate over a one year rolling period, and 10 percent reserve capacity beyond anticipated daily peak to provide robustness and flexibility to the grid in times of disaster, disturbances, or both.(d) Separate and distinct territories for maintenance of electrical grid and transmission infrastructure which shall be separate, unrelated entities from the electrical utility operators.(e) Electrical utility operators shall contract with maintenance operators and factor such costs into the final rates offered to consumers.